Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HCR2052.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona:
Section 1. Title 9, chapter 4, article 8, Arizona
Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 9-500.54, to
read:
9-500.54. Municipal fees; taxes; utility rates;
increase; moratorium; applicability;
enforcement; definitions
A. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, ORDINANCE, CHARTER
PROVISION OR RESOLUTION, BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026 THROUGH JUNE
30, 2030, A MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT ADOPT, IMPOSE OR COLLECT ANY
OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. A FEE THAT IS IN AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN THE AMOUNT
THAT IS AUTHORIZED IN THE FEE SCHEDULE THAT HAS BEEN ADOPTED
BY THE MUNICIPALITY AS PART OF THE MUNICIPALITY'S 2025-2026
FISCAL YEAR BUDGET, INCLUDING ANY FEE SCHEDULE THAT IS ADOPTED

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2052
BY AN ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION OR THAT IS INCORPORATED BY
REFERENCE.
2. ANY TRANSACTION PRIVILEGE TAX OR SURCHARGE INCREASE
BEYOND THE RATE THAT IS IN EFFECT ON JUNE 3O, 2026.
3. A RATE THAT IS IMPOSED FOR UTILITY SERVICE PROVIDED
BY THE MUNICIPALITY AND THAT IS GREATER THAN THE UTILITY RATE
THAT IS AUTHORIZED AS PART OF THE MUNICIPALITY'S 2025-2026
FISCAL YEAR BUDGET OR UTILITY RATE SCHEDULE[, EXCEPT THAT A
MUNICIPALITY THAT HAS NOT RAISED UTILITY RATES BY A CUMULATIVE
AMOUNT OF TWELVE PERCENT OR MORE IN THE PRECEDING FOUR FISCAL
YEARS MAY INCREASE UTILITY RATES BY AN AMOUNT THAT IS NOT MORE
THAN THE RATE OF INFLATION AS DETERMINED BY THE CONSUMER PRICE
INDEX AS PUBLISHED BY THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF LABOR,
BUREAU OF LABOR STATISTICS].
B. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, ORDINANCE, CHARTER
PROVISION OR RESOLUTION, BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026 THROUGH JUNE
30, 2030, A MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT ADOPT OR IMPOSE A NEW TAX
CLASSIFICATION OR EXPAND THE TAX BASE TO ADDITIONAL TAXPAYERS.
C. IF A MUNICIPALITY HAS NOT ADOPTED A CONSOLIDATED OR
COMPREHENSIVE FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE SCHEDULE AS PART OF THE
MUNICIPALITY'S 2025-2026 FISCAL YEAR BUDGET, THE APPLICABLE
FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE, FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE FEE, TAX OR
UTILITY RATE LIMITS PRESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION A OF THIS
SECTION, SHALL BE THE HIGHEST FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE THAT IS
IMPOSED BY THE MUNICIPALITY AT ANY TIME DURING THE 2025-2026
FISCAL YEAR.
D. A MUNICIPALITY MAY NOT CIRCUMVENT THIS SECTION BY
DOING ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. RENAMING, RECLASSIFYING OR RESTRUCTURING A FEE, TAX
OR UTILITY RATE.
2. ALTERING METHODOLOGIES, ASSUMPTIONS, SERVICE AREAS,
CUSTOMER CLASSES OR COST-ALLOCATION PRACTICES.
3. IMPOSING A NEW CHARGE THAT IS SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR
IN EFFECT TO AN INCREASE IN A FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE THAT IS
PROHIBITED BY THIS SECTION.
4. ADOPTING OR AMENDING A FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE
SCHEDULE DURING THE 2025-2026 FISCAL YEAR FOR THE PRIMARY
PURPOSE OF AVOIDING THE APPLICATION OF THIS SECTION.
E. THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL MUNICIPAL FEES, TAXES
AND UTILITY RATES, REGARDLESS OF THE NAME OR TITLE, THAT ARE
IMPOSED AS A CONDITION OF ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CONDUCTING A TAXABLE TRANSACTION.
2. RECEIVING A GOVERNMENTAL SERVICE.
3. OBTAINING A PERMIT, LICENSE, APPROVAL OR INSPECTION.
4. CONNECTING TO OR RECEIVING MUNICIPALLY PROVIDED
UTILITY SERVICE.
-2-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2052
5. DEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION, OCCUPANCY, OPERATION OR
CHANGE IN USE.
F. THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO [ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING:
1.] AN INCREASE IN A MUNICIPAL TAX IF ALL OF THE
FOLLOWING APPLY:
[1.][(a)] THE TAX INCREASE IS APPROVED BY THE QUALIFIED
ELECTORS OF THE MUNICIPALITY.
[2.][(b)] AT LEAST SIXTY PERCENT OF THE VOTES CAST AT
THE ELECTION ARE CAST IN FAVOR OF THE MEASURE.
[3.][(c)] THE ELECTION IS HELD ON A CONSOLIDATED
ELECTION DATE IN AN EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR PURSUANT TO SECTION
16-204.
[2. AD VALOREM TAXES OR SPECIAL ASSESSMENTS LEVIED TO
PAY THE PRINCIPAL OF AND THE INTEREST AND REDEMPTION CHARGES
ON BONDED INDEBTEDNESS OR OTHER LAWFUL LONG-TERM OBLIGATIONS
ISSUED OR INCURRED FOR A SPECIFIC PURPOSE.
3. AD VALOREM TAXES OR ASSESSMENTS LEVIED BY OR FOR
PROPERTY IMPROVEMENT ASSESSMENT DISTRICTS, IMPROVEMENT
DISTRICTS AND OTHER SPECIAL PURPOSE DISTRICTS OTHER THAN A
MUNICIPALITY OR COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT.
4. THE INITIAL ADOPTION OF A MUNICIPALITY'S TAX, FEE OR
UTILITY RATE STRUCTURE IF THE MUNICIPALITY WAS INCORPORATED
WITHIN THE TWO CALENDAR YEARS BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF
THIS SECTION. THIS SECTION APPLIES TO THE MUNICIPALITY
DESCRIBED IN THIS PARAGRAPH AFTER THE MUNICIPALITY INITIALLY
ADOPTS THE TAX, FEE OR UTILITY RATE STRUCTURE.]
G. THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. THE EXPIRATION, REDUCTION OR ELIMINATION OF A FEE,
TAX OR UTILITY RATE.
2. THE COLLECTION OF A FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE THAT IS
AT OR BELOW THE AMOUNT THAT IS AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTIONS A AND C OF THIS SECTION.
3. AN INCREASE IN TOTAL REVENUE THAT RESULTS SOLELY
FROM AN INCREASE IN SERVICE DEMAND, USAGE OR GROWTH IN THE TAX
BASE.
[4. THE ADOPTION, IMPOSITION OR COLLECTION OF A NEW OR
INCREASED RATE OR FEE PURSUANT TO SECTION 9-463.05 OR 9-511.01
TO FUND THE ACQUISITION AND DELIVERY OF NEW OR ADDITIONAL
WATER RESOURCES, INCLUDING THE COST OF ANY PREVIOUSLY INCURRED
OR FUTURE DEBT SERVICE OBLIGATIONS, NEEDED STORAGE, TREATMENT
OR DELIVERY INFRASTRUCTURE AND OPERATING AND MAINTENANCE
COSTS.]
H. A FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE ADOPTED, IMPOSED OR
COLLECTED THAT IS IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS VOID. A
MUNICIPALITY THAT ADOPTS, IMPOSES OR COLLECTS A FEE, TAX OR
-3-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2052
UTILITY RATE THAT IS IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT
TO ENFORCEMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION 41-194.01.
I. A TAXPAYER, RESIDENT, BUSINESS OR PROPERTY OWNER
THAT IS AGGRIEVED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING AN
ACTION FOR DECLARATORY OR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF IN A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION. THE COURT MAY AWARD REASONABLE
ATTORNEY FEES AND COSTS TO A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF.
J. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION:
1. "FEE" MEANS ANY CHARGE IMPOSED BY A MUNICIPALITY
THAT IS NOT A TAX OR UTILITY RATE, REGARDLESS OF THE NAME OR
TITLE.
2. "UTILITY SERVICE":
(a) MEANS MUNICIPALLY PROVIDED UTILITY SERVICES.
(b) INCLUDES WATER, WASTEWATER, STORMWATER, SOLID
WASTE, ELECTRIC, GAS OR SIMILAR SERVICES.
Sec. 2. Delayed repeal
Section 9-500.54, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by
this act, is repealed from and after June 30, 2030.
Sec. 3. Title 11, chapter 2, article 4, Arizona Revised
Statutes, is amended by adding section 11-269.31, to read:
11-269.31. County fees; taxes; utility rates; increase;
moratorium; applicability; enforcement;
definitions
A. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, ORDINANCE, CHARTER
PROVISION OR RESOLUTION, BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026 THROUGH JUNE
30, 2030, A COUNTY MAY NOT ADOPT, IMPOSE OR COLLECT ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING:
1. A FEE THAT IS IN AN AMOUNT GREATER THAN THE AMOUNT
THAT IS AUTHORIZED IN THE FEE SCHEDULE THAT HAS BEEN ADOPTED
BY THE COUNTY AS PART OF THE COUNTY'S 2025-2026 FISCAL YEAR
BUDGET, INCLUDING ANY FEE SCHEDULE THAT IS ADOPTED BY AN
ORDINANCE OR RESOLUTION OR THAT IS INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE.
2. ANY TRANSACTION PRIVILEGE TAX OR SURCHARGE INCREASE
BEYOND THE RATE THAT IS IN EFFECT ON JUNE 3O, 2026.
3. A RATE THAT IS IMPOSED FOR UTILITY SERVICE PROVIDED
BY THE COUNTY AND THAT IS GREATER THAN THE UTILITY RATE THAT
IS AUTHORIZED AS PART OF THE COUNTY'S 2025-2026 FISCAL YEAR
BUDGET OR UTILITY RATE SCHEDULE.
B. NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, ORDINANCE, CHARTER
PROVISION OR RESOLUTION, BEGINNING JULY 1, 2026 THROUGH JUNE
30, 2030, A COUNTY MAY NOT ADOPT OR IMPOSE A NEW TAX
CLASSIFICATION OR EXPAND THE TAX BASE TO ADDITIONAL TAXPAYERS.
C. IF A COUNTY HAS NOT ADOPTED A CONSOLIDATED OR
COMPREHENSIVE FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE SCHEDULE AS PART OF THE
COUNTY'S 2025-2026 FISCAL YEAR BUDGET, THE APPLICABLE FEE, TAX
OR UTILITY RATE, FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE FEE, TAX OR UTILITY
RATE LIMITS PRESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION A OF THIS SECTION, SHALL
-4-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2052
BE THE HIGHEST FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE THAT IS IMPOSED BY THE
COUNTY AT ANY TIME DURING THE 2025-2026 FISCAL YEAR.
D. A COUNTY MAY NOT CIRCUMVENT THIS SECTION BY DOING
ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. RENAMING, RECLASSIFYING OR RESTRUCTURING A FEE, TAX
OR UTILITY RATE.
2. ALTERING METHODOLOGIES, ASSUMPTIONS, SERVICE AREAS,
CUSTOMER CLASSES OR COST-ALLOCATION PRACTICES.
3. IMPOSING A NEW CHARGE THAT IS SUBSTANTIALLY SIMILAR
IN EFFECT TO AN INCREASE IN A FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE THAT IS
PROHIBITED BY THIS SECTION.
4. ADOPTING OR AMENDING A FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE
SCHEDULE DURING THE 2025-2026 FISCAL YEAR FOR THE PRIMARY
PURPOSE OF AVOIDING THE APPLICATION OF THIS SECTION.
E. THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ALL COUNTY FEES, TAXES AND
UTILITY RATES, REGARDLESS OF THE NAME OR TITLE, THAT ARE
IMPOSED AS A CONDITION OF ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CONDUCTING A TAXABLE TRANSACTION.
2. RECEIVING A GOVERNMENTAL SERVICE.
3. OBTAINING A PERMIT, LICENSE, APPROVAL OR INSPECTION.
4. CONNECTING TO OR RECEIVING COUNTY-PROVIDED UTILITY
SERVICE.
5. DEVELOPMENT, CONSTRUCTION, OCCUPANCY, OPERATION OR
CHANGE IN USE.
F. THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO [ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING:
1.] AN INCREASE IN A COUNTY TAX IF ALL OF THE FOLLOWING
APPLY:
[1.][(a)] THE TAX INCREASE IS APPROVED BY THE QUALIFIED
ELECTORS OF THE COUNTY.
[2.][(b)] AT LEAST SIXTY PERCENT OF THE VOTES CAST AT
THE ELECTION ARE CAST IN FAVOR OF THE MEASURE.
[3.][(c)] THE ELECTION IS HELD ON A CONSOLIDATED
ELECTION DATE IN AN EVEN-NUMBERED YEAR PURSUANT TO SECTION
16-204.
[2. AD VALOREM TAXES OR SPECIAL ASSESSMENTS LEVIED TO
PAY THE PRINCIPAL OF AND THE INTEREST AND REDEMPTION CHARGES
ON BONDED INDEBTEDNESS OR OTHER LAWFUL LONG-TERM OBLIGATIONS
ISSUED OR INCURRED FOR A SPECIFIC PURPOSE.
3. AD VALOREM TAXES OR ASSESSMENTS LEVIED BY OR FOR
PROPERTY IMPROVEMENT ASSESSMENT DISTRICTS, IMPROVEMENT
DISTRICTS AND OTHER SPECIAL PURPOSE DISTRICTS OTHER THAN A
COUNTY OR COMMUNITY COLLEGE DISTRICT.
4. AD VALOREM TAXES LEVIED BY A COUNTY FOR SUPPORT OF A
SCHOOL DISTRICT.]
G. THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT ANY OF THE FOLLOWING:
-5-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2052
1. THE EXPIRATION, REDUCTION OR ELIMINATION OF A FEE,
TAX OR UTILITY RATE.
2. THE COLLECTION OF A FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE THAT IS
AT OR BELOW THE AMOUNT THAT IS AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO
SUBSECTIONS A AND C OF THIS SECTION.
3. AN INCREASE IN TOTAL REVENUE THAT RESULTS SOLELY
FROM AN INCREASE IN SERVICE DEMAND, USAGE OR GROWTH IN THE TAX
BASE.
H. A FEE, TAX OR UTILITY RATE ADOPTED, IMPOSED OR
COLLECTED THAT IS IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS VOID. A
COUNTY THAT ADOPTS, IMPOSES OR COLLECTS A FEE, TAX OR UTILITY
RATE THAT IS IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO
ENFORCEMENT PURSUANT TO SECTION 41-194.01.
I. A TAXPAYER, RESIDENT BUSINESS OR PROPERTY OWNER WHO
IS AGGRIEVED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION MAY BRING AN
ACTION FOR DECLARATORY OR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF IN A COURT OF
COMPETENT JURISDICTION. THE COURT MAY AWARD REASONABLE
ATTORNEY FEES AND COSTS TO A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF.
J. FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION:
1. "FEE" MEANS ANY CHARGE IMPOSED BY A COUNTY THAT IS
NOT A TAX OR UTILITY RATE, REGARDLESS OF THE NAME OR TITLE.
2. "UTILITY SERVICE":
(a) MEANS COUNTY-PROVIDED UTILITY SERVICES.
(b) INCLUDES WATER, WASTEWATER, STORMWATER, SOLID
WASTE, ELECTRIC, GAS OR SIMILAR SERVICES.
Sec. 4. Delayed repeal
Section 11-269.31, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by
this act, is repealed from and after June 30, 2030.
Sec. 5. Severability
If a provision of this act or its application to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does
not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end the provisions of this act are
severable.
Sec. 6. Legislative findings and intent
A. The legislature finds that:
1. Arizona residents and businesses continue to
experience elevated inflation and rising costs, including
housing, utilities, construction, labor and essential
services, placing increased pressure on household budgets and
economic activity.
2. Local government taxes, fees and utility rates
materially affect affordability, business formation, housing
development and the overall cost of living throughout this
state.
-6-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2052
3. Municipalities and counties regularly adopt annual
budgets, tax rates and fee and utility rate schedules, which
reflect policy judgments about reasonable and necessary
charges for services at a given point in time.
4. Advancements in technology, including artificial
intelligence and automation, present unprecedented
opportunities for local governments to streamline operations,
improve service delivery, increase productivity, and reduce
the need for ongoing growth in full-time staffing levels.
5. This state has recognized the importance of
operational efficiency, including through executive
initiatives such as the Arizona capacity and efficiency
initiative, which emphasizes identifying efficiencies,
modernizing operations and improving government performance,
recognizing potentially hundreds of millions of dollars in
cost savings that should be passed on to taxpayers.
6. Temporary restraint on local fee, tax and utility
rate increases encourages local governments to prioritize
efficiency, innovation and responsible fiscal management,
while preserving the ability to meet service demands through
improved processes and increased service volume.
7. Local governments retain discretion to manage
expenditures, staffing, service levels and capital planning
within existing fee, tax and utility rate structures during
the moratorium period.
B. It is the intent of the legislature to:
1. Provide temporary relief to residents and businesses
by stabilizing locally imposed fees, taxes and utility rates
during a period of elevated inflation and economic
uncertainty.
2. Encourage local governments to pursue efficiencies
and modernization before increasing costs borne by residents
and businesses.
3. Preserve predictability and transparency in local
government fee, tax and rate structures by anchoring charges
to duly adopted budgets and schedules.
4. Respect constitutional limitations, existing
contractual obligations and voter-approved authorities, while
promoting affordability and economic stability statewide.
Sec. 7. Short title
This act may be cited as the "Local Cost-of-Living
Protection Act".
2. The Secretary of State shall submit this proposition to the
voters at the next general election as provided by article IV, part 1,
section 1, Constitution of Arizona.
Enroll and engross to conform
-7-

House Amendments to H.C.R. 2052
Amend title to conform
JUSTIN OLSON
HCR2052FloorOLSON1.docx
03/11/2026
10:35 AM
C: ED
130MOOZMY
-8-